Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.430

Reimbursement payment—Availability of funds.

(1) For any reimbursement of election costs under RCW 29A.04.420, the secretary of state shall pay within thirty days after the receipt of a properly executed and documented voucher for such expenses and the entry of an allotment from specifically appropriated funds for this purpose until those funds are exhausted. If funds appropriated for this purpose are not sufficient to pay all claims, the secretary of state shall include a budget request to the legislature during the next legislative session for sufficient funds for reimbursement of all remaining claims and shall pay all properly executed and documented vouchers to the counties within thirty days of allotment of specifically appropriated funds for this purpose. The secretary of state shall promptly notify any county that submits an incomplete or inaccurate voucher for reimbursement under RCW 29A.04.420.

(2) Funding provided in this section to counties for election costs in even-numbered years is retrospective and prospective reimbursement under RCW 43.135.060 for any new or increased responsibilities under this title.

[ 2020 c 337 s 4; 2003 c 111 s 148; 1986 c 167 s 7. Formerly RCW 29.13.048.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 337: See note following RCW 29A.04.410.

Severability—1986 c 167: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.